Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, "postsecondary educational
institution" includes postsecondary educational institutions as defined in
K.S.A. 74-3201b, and amendments thereto, and any not-for-profit
institution of postsecondary education with its main campus or principal
place of operation in Kansas, is operated independently and not controlled
or administered by any state agency or subdivision of the state, maintains
open enrollment and is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting
agency for higher education in the United States means a postsecondary
educational institution with a physical presence in Kansas that offers a
course of instruction in nursing that is both nationally accredited and
approved by the board of nursing.
(b) There is hereby established the Kansas nursing initiative grant
program. The program shall be administered by the state board of regents.
Subject to appropriations therefor, any postsecondary educational
institution with an accredited nursing program may submit an application
for a need-based or competitive grant of moneys in an amount to be
determined by the state board subject to the provisions of this section for
the expansion of nursing faculty, laboratory supplies and tools for student
success. Grants shall not require any funding match in order to receive
funds from this program. The state board shall require a funding match
on a dollar-for-dollar basis in order for an institution to be eligible to
receive a grant under this program.
(c) The Kansas nursing initiative grant program shall allow
postsecondary educational institutions to:
(1) Apply for and receive up to $100,000 for nonconsumable

HB 2248—Am. by HC 2
laboratory supplies and equipment;
(2) expend the grant funds on adjunct clinical instructors, including
partial funding of an adjunct clinical instructor who may be employed by a
healthcare facility;
(3) request funding for tools for student success, including, but not
limited to, general tutoring, study skills, preparatory skills for taking
exams and preparatory licensing classes; and
(4) request funding for student support that may impact a student's
ability to attend and complete the program, including, but not limited to,
childcare services.
(d) In order to be eligible for a grant under this section, the accredited
nursing program of the institution shall:
(1) Be nationally accredited;
(2) be approved by the Kansas board of nursing; and
(3) have national council licensure examination test scores at or
above the most recent three-year national averageGrants from the
program to postsecondary educational institutions may be used for,
but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Supplies and equipment needed to deliver courses in the
nursing program;
(2) salaries for instructors in the nursing program, including
adjunct clinical instructors;
(3) funding for additional faculty in the nursing program;
(4) professional development for instructors in the nursing
program;
(5) student support services, including, but not limited to,
NCLEX test prep and practice testing, tutoring and study skills; and
(6) funding for student support that may impact a student's
ability to attend and complete the program, including, but not limited
to, childcare services.
(e)(d) The institution shall submit to the state board an application for
a grant. The application shall be prepared in such form and manner as
required by the state board and submitted at a time to be determined and
specified by the state board.
(f)(e) The state board shall establish standards and criteria for
reviewing, evaluating and approving applications for grants submitted
pursuant to this section. All grants shall be awarded by the state board in
accordance with the standards and criteria established by the state board.
Within the limitations of appropriations therefor, the state board shall
determine the amount and number of grants and be responsible for
payment of grants to institutions.
(g)(f) Each institution that is awarded a grant under this section shall
make such periodic and special reports of statistical and financial

HB 2248—Am. by HC 3
information to the state board as it may request.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.